Utah statutes.
31A-23b-402.   Probation -- Grounds for revocation.

(1)  The commissioner may place a licensee on probation for a period not to exceed 24 months as follows:

(a)  after an adjudicative proceeding under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, for any circumstances that would justify a suspension under this section; or

(b)  at the issuance of a new license:

(i)  with an admitted violation under 18 U.S.C. Secs. 1033 and 1034; or

(ii)  with a response to background information questions on a new license application indicating that:

(A)  the person has been convicted of a crime that is listed by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as a crime that is a ground for probation;

(B)  the person is currently charged with a crime that is listed by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as a crime that is a ground for probation regardless of whether adjudication is withheld;

(C)  the person has been involved in an administrative proceeding regarding any professional or occupational license; or

(D)  any business in which the person is or was an owner, partner, officer, or director has been involved in an administrative proceeding regarding any professional or occupational license.

(2)  The commissioner may place a licensee on probation for a specified period no longer than 24 months if the licensee has admitted to a violation under 18 U.S.C. Secs. 1033 and 1034.

(3)  The probation order shall state the conditions for revocation or retention of the license, which shall be reasonable.

(4)  Any violation of the probation is a ground for revocation pursuant to any proceeding authorized under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

